Missouri, session 2026, HB3425.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 213.010, 213.030, 213.040, 213.045, 213.050, 213.055, 213.065,
213.070, 213.075, 213.101, and 213.111, RSMo, are repealed and eleven new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 213.010, 213.030, 213.040, 213.045, 213.050,
213.055, 213.065, 213.070, 213.075, 213.101, and 213.111, to read as follows:
213.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Age", an age of forty or more years but less than seventy years, except that it
shall not be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to require the compulsory
retirement of any person who has attained the age of sixty-five and who, for the two-year
period immediately before retirement, is employed in a bona fide executive or high policy-
making position, if such person is entitled to an immediate nonforfeitable annual retirement
benefit from a pension, profit sharing, savings or deferred compensation plan, or any
combination of such plans, of the employer, which equals, in the aggregate, at least forty-four
thousand dollars;
(2) "Because" or "because of", as it relates to the adverse decision or action, the
protected criterion was the motivating factor;
(3) "Commission", the Missouri commission on human rights;
(4) "Complainant", a person who has filed a complaint with the commission alleging
that another person has engaged in a prohibited discriminatory practice;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3425 2
(5) "Disability", a physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or
more of a person's major life activities, being regarded as having such an impairment, or a
record of having such an impairment, which with or without reasonable accommodation does
not interfere with performing the job, utilizing the place of public accommodation, or
occupying the dwelling in question. For purposes of this chapter, the term "disability" does
not include current, illegal use of or addiction to a controlled substance as such term is
defined by section 195.010; however, a person may be considered to have a disability if that
person:
(a) Has successfully completed a supervised drug rehabilitation program and is no
longer engaging in the illegal use of, and is not currently addicted to, a controlled substance or
has otherwise been rehabilitated successfully and is no longer engaging in such use and is not
currently addicted;
(b) Is participating in a supervised rehabilitation program and is no longer engaging
in illegal use of controlled substances; or
(c) Is erroneously regarded as currently illegally using, or being addicted to, a
controlled substance;
(6) "Discrimination", conduct proscribed herein, taken because of race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, [or] sexual orientation, gender identity, age as it
relates to employment, disability, veteran status, or familial status as it relates to housing.
"Discrimination" includes any unfair treatment based on a person's presumed or
assumed race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, age as it relates to employment, disability, veteran status, or familial status as it
relates to housing, regardless of whether the presumption or assumption as to such
characteristic is correct;
(7) "Dwelling", any building, structure or portion thereof which is occupied as, or
designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or more families, and any vacant
land which is offered for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure or portion thereof;
(8) "Employer", a person engaged in an industry affecting commerce who has six or
more employees for each working day in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the
current or preceding calendar year, and shall include the state, or any political or civil
subdivision thereof, or any person employing six or more persons within the state but does
not include corporations and associations owned or operated by religious or sectarian
organizations. "Employer" shall not include:
(a) The United States;
(b) A corporation wholly owned by the government of the United States;
(c) [An individual employed by an employer;

HB 3425 3
(d) An Indian tribe;
(e)] Any department or agency of the District of Columbia subject by statute to
procedures of the competitive service, as defined in 5 U.S.C. Section [2101] 2102; or
[(f)] (d) A bona fide private membership club, other than a labor organization, that is
exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c);
(9) "Employment agency" includes any person or agency, public or private, regularly
undertaking with or without compensation to procure employees for an employer or to
procure for employees opportunities to work for an employer;
(10) "Executive director", the executive director of the Missouri commission on
human rights;
(11) "Familial status", one or more individuals who have not attained the age of
eighteen years being domiciled with:
(a) A parent or another person having legal custody of such individual; or
(b) The designee of such parent or other person having such custody, with the written
permission of such parent or other person. The protections afforded against discrimination
because of familial status shall apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of
securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of eighteen years;
(12) "Gender identity", the gender-related identity, appearance, mannerisms, or
other gender-related characteristics of an individual, with or without regard to the
individual's assigned sex at birth;
(13) "Human rights fund", a fund established to receive civil penalties as required by
federal regulations and as set forth by subdivision (2) of subsection 11 of section 213.075, and
which will be disbursed to offset additional expenses related to compliance with the
Department of Housing and Urban Development regulations;
[(13)] (14) "Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or of dealing with employers concerning
grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in
relation to employment;
[(14)] (15) "Local commissions", any commission or agency established prior to
August 13, 1986, by an ordinance or order adopted by the governing body of any city,
constitutional charter city, town, village, or county;
(16) "Motivating factor", the employee's protected classification played a role in
the adverse decision or action, or had a determinative influence on the adverse decision
or action;
[(15)] (17) "Person" includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,
associations, organizations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,

HB 3425 4
joint stock companies, trusts, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, fiduciaries, or other
organized groups of persons;
[(16)] (18) "Places of public accommodation", all places or businesses offering or
holding out to the general public, goods, services, privileges, facilities, advantages or
accommodations for the peace, comfort, health, welfare and safety of the general public or
such public places providing food, shelter, recreation and amusement, including, but not
limited to:
(a) Any inn, hotel, motel, or other establishment which provides lodging to transient
guests, other than an establishment located within a building which contains not more than
five rooms for rent or hire and which is actually occupied by the proprietor of such
establishment as [his] the proprietor's residence;
(b) Any restaurant, cafeteria, lunchroom, lunch counter, soda fountain, or other
100 facility principally engaged in selling food for consumption on the premises, including, but
101 not limited to, any such facility located on the premises of any retail establishment;
102 (c) Any gasoline station, including all facilities located on the premises of such
103 gasoline station and made available to the patrons thereof;
104 (d) Any motion picture house, theater, concert hall, sports arena, stadium, or other
105 place of exhibition or entertainment;
106 (e) Any public facility owned, operated, or managed by or on behalf of this state or
107 any agency or subdivision thereof, or any public corporation; and any such facility supported
108 in whole or in part by public funds;
109 (f) Any establishment which is physically located within the premises of any
110 establishment otherwise covered by this section or within the premises of which is physically
111 located any such covered establishment, and which holds itself out as serving patrons of such
112 covered establishment;
113 (19) "Race", a perception that a person is of a particular racial group based
114 upon:
115 (a) Shared physical traits associated with ancestral origin or ethnicity;
116 (b) Shared cultural attributes;
117 (c) The wearing of protective hairstyles including, but not limited to, hairstyles
118 and coverings that are designed to protect textured hair from damage so that it may be
119 worn in its natural state, such as braids, wigs, locs, twists, and afros; and
120 (d) Similar physical characteristics such as skin color and facial features;
121 [(17)] (20) "Rent" includes to lease, to sublease, to let and otherwise to grant for
122 consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by the occupant;
123 [(18)] (21) "Respondent", a person who is alleged to have engaged in a prohibited
124 discriminatory practice in a complaint filed with the commission;

HB 3425 5
125 (22) "Sexual orientation", one's actual or perceived emotional or physical
126 attraction to, or romantic or physical relationships with, members of the same gender,
127 members of a different gender, or members of any gender; or the lack of any emotional
128 or physical attraction to, or romantic or physical relationships with, anyone. The term
129 "sexual orientation" includes a history of such attraction or relationships or a history of
130 no such attraction or relationships;
131 [(19) "The motivating factor", the employee's protected classification actually played
132 a role in the adverse action or decision and had a determinative influence on the adverse
133 decision or action;
134 (20)] (23) "Unlawful discriminatory practice", any act that is unlawful under this
135 chapter;
136 (24) "Veteran status", an individual who served in any branch of the Armed
137 Forces of the United States or the Missouri National Guard who was discharged for any
138 reason other than dishonorable discharge or bad conduct discharge.
213.030. 1. The powers and duties of the commission shall be:
(1) To seek to eliminate and prevent discrimination because of race, color, religion,
national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age as it relates to
employment, disability, veteran status, or familial status as it relates to housing and to take
other actions against discrimination because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran status, or familial status as
provided by law; and the commission is hereby given general jurisdiction and power for such
purposes;
(2) To implement the purposes of this chapter first by conference, conciliation and
persuasion so that persons may be guaranteed their civil rights and goodwill be fostered;
(3) To formulate policies to implement the purposes of this chapter and to make
recommendations to agencies and officers of the state and political subdivisions in aid of such
policies and purposes;
(4) To appoint such employees as it may deem necessary, fix their compensation
within the appropriations provided and in accordance with the wage structure established for
other state agencies, and prescribe their duties;
(5) To obtain upon request and utilize the services of all governmental departments
and agencies to be paid from appropriations to this commission;
(6) To adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind suitable rules and regulations to carry
out the provisions of this chapter and the policies and practices of the commission in
connection therewith;
(7) To receive, investigate, initiate, and pass upon complaints alleging discrimination
in employment, housing or in places of public accommodations because of race, color,

HB 3425 6
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age as it relates
to employment, disability, veteran status, or familial status as it relates to housing and to
require the production for examination of any books, papers, records, or other materials
relating to any matter under investigation;
(8) To hold hearings, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, administer oaths,
to take the testimony of any person under oath, and, in connection therewith, to require the
production for examination of any books, papers or other materials relating to any matter
under investigation or in question before the commission;
(9) To issue publications and the results of studies and research which will tend to
promote goodwill and minimize or eliminate discrimination in housing, employment or in
places of public accommodation because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age as it relates to employment, disability, veteran
status, or familial status as it relates to housing;
(10) To provide each year to the governor and to the general assembly a full written
report of all its activities and of its recommendations;
(11) To adopt an official seal;
(12) To cooperate, act jointly, enter into cooperative or work-sharing agreements with
the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development, and other federal agencies and local commissions or
agencies to achieve the purposes of this chapter;
(13) To accept grants, private gifts, bequests, and establish funds to dispose of such
moneys so long as the conditions of the grant, gift, or bequest are not inconsistent with the
purposes of this chapter and are used to achieve the purposes of this chapter;
(14) To establish a human rights fund as defined in section 213.010, for the purposes
of administering sections 213.040, 213.045, 213.050, 213.070, 213.075, and 213.076.
2. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall
become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of [section
536.024] chapter 536.
213.040. 1. It shall be an unlawful housing practice:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, to refuse to negotiate
for the sale or rental of, to deny or otherwise make unavailable, a dwelling to any person
because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, disability, veteran status, or familial status;
(2) To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or
rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection therewith,
because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, disability, veteran status, or familial status;

HB 3425 7
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published any notice,
statement or advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling that indicates any
preference, limitation, or discrimination because of race, color, religion, national origin,
ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or familial
status, or an intention to make any such preference, limitation, or discrimination;
(4) To represent to any person because of race, color, religion, national origin,
ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or familial
status that any dwelling is not available for inspection, sale, or rental when such dwelling is in
fact so available;
(5) To induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any dwelling by
representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or
persons because of a particular race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or familial status;
(6) To discriminate in the sale or rental of, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny,
a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a disability of:
(a) That buyer or renter;
(b) A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is so sold,
rented, or made available; or
(c) Any person associated with that buyer or renter;
(7) To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or
rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with such
dwelling, because of a disability of:
(a) That person;
(b) A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is so sold,
rented, or made available; or
(c) Any person associated with that person.
2. For purposes of this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050, discrimination
includes:
(1) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person with the disability, reasonable
modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such
modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the premises, except
that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so, condition
permission for a modification on the renter's agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to
the condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;
(2) A refusal to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies, practices, or
services, when such accommodations may be necessary to afford such person equal
opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or

HB 3425 8
(3) In connection with the design and construction of covered multifamily dwellings
for first occupancy after March 13, 1991, a failure to design and construct those dwellings in
such a manner that:
(a) The public use and common use portions of such dwellings are readily accessible
to and usable by persons with a disability;
(b) All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premises within such
dwellings are sufficiently wide to allow passage by persons with a disability in wheelchairs;
and
(c) All premises within such dwellings contain the following features of adaptive
design:
a. An accessible route into and through the dwelling;
b. Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other environmental controls in
accessible locations;
c. Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later installation of grab bars; and
d. Usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a wheelchair can
maneuver about the space.
3. As used in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section, the term "covered
multifamily dwelling" means:
(1) Buildings consisting of four or more units if such buildings have one or more
elevators; and
(2) Ground floor units in other buildings consisting of four or more units.
4. Compliance with the appropriate requirements of the American National Standard
for Buildings and Facilities providing accessibility and usability for people with physical
disabilities, commonly cited as "ANSI A117.1", suffices to satisfy the requirements of
paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section.
5. Where a unit of general local government has incorporated into its laws the
requirements set forth in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section, compliance with such
laws shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of that subdivision. Such compliance shall
be subject to the following provisions:
(1) A unit of general local government may review and approve newly constructed
covered multifamily dwellings for the purpose of making determinations as to whether the
design and construction requirements of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section are
met;
(2) The commission shall encourage, but may not require, the units of local
government to include in their existing procedures for the review and approval of newly
constructed covered multifamily dwellings, determinations as to whether the design and
construction of such dwellings are consistent with subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this

HB 3425 9
section, and shall provide technical assistance to units of local government and other persons
to implement the requirements of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section;
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the commission to review or
approve the plans, designs or construction of all covered dwellings, to determine whether the
design and construction of such dwellings are consistent with the requirements of subdivision
(3) of subsection 2 of this section.
6. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to invalidate or limit any law of the state
or political subdivision of the state, or other jurisdiction in which this chapter shall be
effective, that requires dwellings to be designed and constructed in a manner that affords
persons with disabilities greater access than is required by this chapter.
7. Nothing in this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050 requires that a dwelling
be made available to an individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct threat to the health
or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy would result in substantial physical damage to
the property of others.
8. Nothing in this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050 limits the applicability of
any reasonable local or state restriction regarding the maximum number of occupants
100 permitted to occupy a dwelling, nor does any provision in this section and sections 213.045
101 and 213.050 regarding familial status apply with respect to housing for older persons.
102 9. As used in this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050, "housing for older
103 persons" means housing:
104 (1) Provided under any state or federal program that the commission determines is
105 specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons, as defined in the state or federal
106 program;
107 (2) Intended for, and solely occupied by, persons sixty-two years of age or older; or
108 (3) Intended and operated for occupancy by at least one person fifty-five years of age
109 or older per unit. In determining whether housing qualifies as housing for older persons
110 under this subsection, the commission shall develop regulations which require at least the
111 following factors:
112 (a) The existence of significant facilities and services specifically designed to meet
113 the physical or social needs of older persons, or if the provision of such facilities and services
114 is not practicable, that such housing is necessary to provide important housing opportunities
115 for older persons; and
116 (b) That at least eighty percent of the units are occupied by at least one person fifty-
117 five years of age or older per unit; and
118 (c) The publication of, and adherence to, policies and procedures which demonstrate
119 an intent by the owner or manager to provide housing for persons fifty-five years of age or
120 older.

HB 3425 10
121 10. Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements for housing for older persons by
122 reason of:
123 (1) Persons residing in such housing as of August 28, 1992, who do not meet the age
124 requirements of subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 9 of this section, provided that new
125 occupants of such housing meet the age requirements of subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 9
126 of this section; or
127 (2) Unoccupied units, provided that such units are reserved for occupancy by persons
128 who meet the age requirements of subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 9 of this section.
129 11. Nothing in this section or section 213.045 or 213.050 shall prohibit conduct
130 against a person because such person has been convicted by any court of competent
131 jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance, as defined by
132 section 195.010.
133 12. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a religious organization, association, or
134 society, or any nonprofit institution or organization operated, supervised or controlled by or in
135 conjunction with a religious organization, association, or society, from limiting the sale, rental
136 or occupancy of dwellings which it owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose to
137 persons of the same religion, or from giving preference to such persons, unless membership in
138 such religion is restricted on account of race, color, or national origin. Nor shall anything in
139 this chapter prohibit a private club not in fact open to the public, which as an incident to its
140 primary purpose or purposes provides lodging which it owns or operates for other than a
141 commercial purpose, from limiting the rental or occupancy of such lodging to its members or
142 from giving preference to its members.
143 13. Nothing in this chapter, other than the prohibitions against discriminatory
144 advertising in subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section, shall apply to:
145 (1) The sale or rental of any single family house by a private individual owner,
146 provided the following conditions are met:
147 (a) The private individual owner does not own or have any interest in more than three
148 single family houses at any one time; and
149 (b) The house is sold or rented without the use of a real estate broker, agent or
150 salesperson or the facilities of any person in the business of selling or renting dwellings and
151 without publication, posting or mailing of any advertisement. If the owner selling the house
152 does not reside in it at the time of the sale or was not the most recent resident of the house
153 prior to such sale, the exemption in this section applies to only one such sale in any twenty-
154 four-month period; or
155 (2) Rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or intended to be
156 occupied by no more than four families living independently of each other, if the owner
157 actually maintains and occupies one of such living quarters as his or her residence.

HB 3425 11
213.045. It shall be unlawful for any bank, building and loan association, insurance
company or other corporation, association, firm or enterprise whose business consists in
whole or in part in the making of commercial real estate loans, to deny a loan or other
financial assistance because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or familial status to a person
applying therefor for the purpose of purchasing, construction, improving, repairing, or
maintaining a dwelling, or to discriminate against [him] such person in fixing of the amount,
interest rate, duration or other terms or conditions of such loan or other financial assistance,
because of the race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, disability, veteran status, or familial status of such person or of any person
associated with [him] such person in connection with such loan or other financial assistance,
or of the present or prospective owners, lessees, tenants, or occupants, of the dwellings in
relation to which such loan or other financial assistance is to be made or given.
213.050. It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to or membership or
participation in any multiple listing service, real estate brokers' organization or other service
organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings, because of
race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
disability, veteran status, or familial status.
213.055. 1. It shall be an unlawful employment practice:
(1) For an employer, because of the race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, veteran status, or disability of any individual:
(a) To fail or refuse to hire or to discharge any individual, or otherwise to discriminate
against any individual with respect to [his] such individual's compensation, terms,
conditions, or privileges of employment, because of such individual's race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, veteran status, or
disability;
(b) To limit, segregate, or classify [his] employees or [his] employment applicants in
any way which would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment opportunities
or otherwise adversely affect [his] such individual's status as an employee, because of such
individual's race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
ancestry, age, veteran status, or disability;
(2) For a labor organization to exclude or to expel from its membership any
individual or to discriminate in any way against any of its members or against any employer
or any individual employed by an employer because of race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, veteran status, or disability of any
individual; or to limit, segregate, or classify its membership, or to classify or fail or refuse to
refer for employment any individual, in any way which would deprive or tend to deprive any

HB 3425 12
individual of employment opportunities, or would limit such employment opportunities or
otherwise adversely affect [his] such individual'sstatus as an employee or as an applicant for
employment, because of such individual's race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, veteran status, or disability; or for any
employer, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee controlling
apprenticeship or other training or retraining, including on-the-job training programs to
discriminate against any individual because of [his] such individual's race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, veteran status, or
disability in admission to, or employment in, any program established to provide
apprenticeship or other training;
(3) For any employer or employment agency to print or circulate or cause to be
printed or circulated any statement, advertisement or publication, or to use any form of
application for employment or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective
employment, which expresses, directly or indirectly, any limitation, specification, or
discrimination, because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, ancestry, age, veteran status, or disability unless based upon a bona fide
occupational qualification or for an employment agency to fail or refuse to refer for
employment, or otherwise to discriminate against, any individual because of [his or her] such
individual's race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
ancestry, age as it relates to employment, veteran status, or disability, or to classify or refer
for employment any individual because of [his or her] such individual's race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, veteran status, or
disability.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unlawful
employment practice for an employer to apply different standards of compensation, or
different terms, conditions or privileges of employment pursuant to a bona fide seniority or
merit system, or a system which measures earnings by quantity or quality of production or to
employees who work in different locations, provided that such differences or such systems
are not the result of an intention or a design to discriminate, and are not used to discriminate,
because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin,
ancestry, age, veteran status, or disability, nor shall it be an unlawful employment practice
for an employer to give and to act upon the results of any professionally developed ability
test, provided that such test, its administration, or action upon the results thereof, is not
designed, intended or used to discriminate because of race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, veteran status, or disability.
3. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be interpreted to require any employer,
employment agency, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee subject to this

HB 3425 13
chapter to grant preferential treatment to any individual or to any group because of the race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age,
veteran status, or disability of such individual or group on account of an imbalance which
may exist with respect to the total number or percentage of persons of any race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, veteran
status, or disability employed by any employer, referred or classified for employment by any
employment agency or labor organization, admitted to membership or classified by any labor
organization, or admitted to or employed in any apprenticeship or other training program, in
comparison with the total number or percentage of persons of such race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, veteran status, or
disability in any community, state, section, or other area, or in the available workforce in any
community, state, section, or other area.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unlawful
employment practice for the state or any political subdivision of the state to comply with the
provisions of 29 U.S.C. Section 623 relating to employment as firefighters or law
enforcement officers.
213.065. 1. All persons within the jurisdiction of the state of Missouri are free and
equal and shall be entitled to the full and equal use and enjoyment within this state of any
place of public accommodation, as hereinafter defined, without discrimination or segregation
because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
ancestry, veteran status, or disability.
2. It is an unlawful discriminatory practice for any person, directly or indirectly, to
refuse, withhold from or deny any other person, or to attempt to refuse, withhold from or deny
any other person, any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, services, or privileges
made available in any place of public accommodation, as defined in section 213.010 and this
section, or to segregate or discriminate against any such person in the use thereof because of
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry,
veteran status, or disability.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a private club, a place of
accommodation owned by or operated on behalf of a religious corporation, association or
society, or other establishment which is not in fact open to the public, unless the facilities of
such establishments are made available to the customers or patrons of a place of public
accommodation as defined in section 213.010 and this section.
213.070. 1. It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice [for an employer,
employment agency, labor organization, or place of public accommodation]:
(1) To aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce the commission of acts prohibited under this
chapter or to attempt to do so;

HB 3425 14
(2) To retaliate or discriminate in any manner against any other person because such
person has opposed any practice prohibited by this chapter or because such person has filed a
complaint, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in any investigation, proceeding
or hearing conducted pursuant to this chapter;
(3) For the state or any political subdivision of this state to discriminate on the basis
of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry,
age, as it relates to employment, disability, veteran status, or familial status as it relates to
housing; or
(4) To discriminate in any manner against any other person because of such person's
association with any person protected by this chapter.
2. This chapter, in addition to [chapter] chapters285 and [chapter] 287, shall provide
the exclusive remedy for any and all claims for injury or damages arising out of an
employment relationship.
213.075. 1. [As a jurisdictional condition precedent to filing a civil action under this
chapter,] Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful discriminatory practice [shall]
may make, sign and file with the commission a verified complaint in writing, within one
hundred eighty days of the alleged act of discrimination, which shall state the name and
address of the employer, employment agency, labor organization, or place of public
accommodation alleged to have committed the unlawful discriminatory practice and which
shall set forth the particulars thereof and such other information as may be required by the
commission. The complainant's agent, attorney or the attorney general may, in like manner,
make, sign and file such complaint. The failure to timely file a complaint with the
commission shall deprive the commission of jurisdiction to investigate the complaint. The
commission shall make a determination as to its jurisdiction with respect to all complaints.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, if a complaint is not filed
with the commission within one hundred eighty days of the alleged act of discrimination, the
commission shall lack jurisdiction to take any action on such a complaint other than to
dismiss the complaint for lack of jurisdiction. [The failure to timely file a complaint with the
commission may be raised as a complete defense by a respondent or defendant at any time,
either during the administrative proceedings before the commission, or in subsequent
litigation, regardless of whether the commission has issued the person claiming to be
aggrieved a letter indicating his or her right to bring a civil action and regardless of whether
the employer asserted the defense before the commission.]
2. Any complaint which is filed with the federal Equal Employment Opportunity
Commission or other federal agencies with which the commission has a work-sharing or
deferral agreement, or with a local commission which has been certified as substantially
equivalent by the commission, shall be deemed filed with the commission on the date that

HB 3425 15
such complaint is received by such federal agency or local commission. A copy of all
complaints filed with a local commission with the authority to enforce the provisions of this
chapter is to be forwarded to the commission within seven days of the filing thereof with such
local commission. If a local commission has jurisdiction to hear a complaint filed with the
commission, such complaint shall be deemed to have been filed with the local commission on
the date on which such complaint was filed with the commission. The commission shall,
within seven days of the receipt of a complaint which a local commission has jurisdiction to
hear, forward a copy thereof to such local commission.
3. After the filing of any complaint, the executive director shall, with the assistance of
the commission's staff, promptly investigate the complaint, and if the director determines
after the investigation that probable cause exists for crediting the allegations of the complaint,
the executive director shall immediately endeavor to eliminate the unlawful discriminatory
practice complained of by conference, conciliation and persuasion, and shall report the results
to the commission. The investigation, determination of probable cause and conciliation shall
be conducted according to such rules, regulations and guidelines as the commission shall
prescribe.
4. A person who is not named as a respondent in a complaint, but who is identified as
a respondent in the course of investigation, may be joined as an additional or substitute
respondent upon written notice, pursuant to such rules, regulations, and guidelines as the
commission shall prescribe. Such notice, in addition to complying with the requirements of
such rules, regulations, and guidelines, shall also state the reason why the person to whom the
notice is addressed has been joined as a party.
5. In case of failure to eliminate such discriminatory practice as found in the
investigation, if in the judgment of the [chairperson] chair of the commission circumstances
so warrant, there shall be issued and served in the name of the commission, a written notice,
together with a copy of the complaint, as it may have been amended, requiring the person
named in the complaint, hereinafter referred to as "respondent", to answer the charges of the
complaint at a hearing, at a time and place to be specified in the notice, before a panel of at
least three members of the commission sitting as the commission or before a hearing
examiner licensed to practice law in this state who shall be appointed by the executive
director and approved by the commission. The place of the hearing shall be in the office of
the commission or such other place designated by it, except that if the respondent so requests,
in writing, the hearing shall be held in the county of such person's residence or business
location at the time of the alleged unlawful discriminatory practice. A copy of the notice shall
also be served on the complainants.

HB 3425 16
6. In all cases where a written notice of hearing has been issued and a party has not
elected the option to proceed in circuit court as set forth in section 213.076, the procedures set
forth for a hearing shall apply.
7. The commission shall be a party to the action and shall be represented before the
panel or the hearing examiner by the office of the attorney general or, when so delegated by
the attorney general, a staff attorney of the commission. Neither the hearing examiner nor
any member of the panel shall have participated in the investigation of the complaint.
Evidence concerning endeavors at conciliation shall be excluded.
8. The respondent may file a written verified answer to the complaint and appear at
the hearing in person or otherwise with or without counsel, and submit testimony. At the
discretion of the hearing examiner or the panel, the complainant may be allowed to intervene,
thereby becoming a party to the action with the right to present testimony in person or by
counsel, provided the complainant at all times shall be treated as a party for the purpose of
discovery and the taking of depositions. The commission or complainant intervenor shall
have the power to reasonably and fairly amend any complaint, and the respondent shall have
like power to amend any answer. The testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and
be transcribed.
9. In any contested case before the commission, any party may take and use written
interrogatories, requests for production of documents and other materials, and requests for
admissions, and all other forms of discovery authorized by rules of civil procedure in the
same manner, upon, and under the same conditions, and upon the same notice, as is or may
hereafter be provided for with respect to the taking and using of written interrogatories,
requests for production of documents and other materials, and requests for admissions, and all
other forms of discovery authorized by rules of civil procedure in civil actions in the circuit
court. The panel or hearing examiner shall have the authority to impose sanctions in the same
manner as set forth in the rules of civil procedure.
10. The hearing shall be conducted in the manner provided by chapter 536.
11. When the case is heard by a panel of the commission, the [chairperson] chair of
the commission shall select the hearing panel and the presiding officer. The presiding officer
shall have full authority to call and examine witnesses, admit or exclude evidence and rule
upon all motions and objections. The panel shall state its findings of fact and conclusions of
law, and if, upon all the evidence at the hearing, the panel finds:
(1) That a respondent has engaged in an unlawful discriminatory practice as defined
in this chapter, the commission shall issue and cause to be served on the respondent an order
requiring the respondent to cease and desist from the unlawful discriminatory practice. The
order shall require the respondent to take such affirmative action, as in the panel's judgment
will implement the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, payment of back

HB 3425 17
pay; hiring; reinstatement or upgrading; restoration to membership in any respondent labor
organization; the extension of full, equal and unsegregated housing; the extension of full,
equal and unsegregated public accommodations; extension of a commercial real estate loan or
100 other financial assistance; extension or restoration of membership or participation in any
101 multiple listing service or other real estate service organization or facility; payment of actual
102 damages; and the submission of a report of the manner of compliance;
103 (2) That a respondent has engaged or is about to engage in a violation of section
104 213.040, 213.045, 213.050, or 213.070, to the extent that the alleged violation of section
105 213.070 relates to or involves a violation of one or more of such other sections or relates to or
106 involves the encouraging, aiding, or abetting of a violation of such other sections, the
107 commission may, in addition to the relief provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection, assess
108 a civil penalty against the respondent, for purposes of vindicating the public interest:
109 (a) In an amount not exceeding two thousand dollars if the respondent has not been
110 adjudged to have violated one or more of the sections enumerated in subdivision (2) of this
111 subsection within five years of the date of the filing of the complaint;
112 (b) In an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars if the respondent has been
113 adjudged to have committed one violation of the sections enumerated in subdivision (2) of
114 this subsection within five years of the date on which the complaint is filed;
115 (c) In an amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars if the respondent has been
116 adjudged to have committed two or more prior violations of the sections enumerated in
117 subdivision (2) of this subsection within seven years of the date on which the complaint is
118 filed.
119
120 All civil penalties set forth in this subsection shall be paid to the human rights fund.
121 12. If, upon all the evidence, the panel finds that a respondent has not engaged in any
122 unlawful discriminatory practice, the panel shall state its findings of fact and conclusions of
123 law and shall issue and cause to be served on the complainant and respondent an order
124 dismissing the complaint.
125 13. When the case is heard by a hearing examiner, the examiner shall have all powers
126 described in subdivision (8) of section 213.030 and subsection 11 of this section, for the
127 purpose of the hearing. The hearing examiner shall make findings of fact and conclusions of
128 law and shall recommend to the commission an order granting such relief as provided in
129 subsection 11 of this section or dismissing the complaint as to the respondent as provided in
130 subsection 12 of this section, in accordance with such findings.
131 14. A panel of at least three members of the commission, sitting as the commission,
132 shall review the record, findings and recommended order of the hearing examiner. The panel
133 shall thereafter accept or amend the recommended order which shall become the order of the

HB 3425 18
134 commission. All orders shall be served on the complainant and respondent, and copies shall
135 be delivered to the attorney general and such other public officers as the commission deems
136 proper.
137 15. No order of the commission issued pursuant to this section shall affect any
138 contract, sale, encumbrance or lease consummated before the issuance of such order and
139 involving a bona fide purchaser without actual notice of the charge filed pursuant to this
140 section.
141 16. Any person aggrieved by an order of the commission may appeal as provided in
142 chapter 536.
213.101. [1.] The provisions of this chapter shall be construed to accomplish the
purposes thereof and any law inconsistent with any provision of this chapter shall not apply.
Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of any law
of this state relating to discrimination because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, age, disability, veteran status, or familial
status.
[2. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates the case of McBryde v. Ritenour
School District, 207 S.W.3d 162 (Mo.App. E.D. 2006), and its progeny as it relates to the
necessity and appropriateness of the issuance of a business judgment instruction. In all civil
actions brought under this chapter, a jury shall be given an instruction expressing the business
judgment rule.
3. If an employer in a case brought under this chapter files a motion pursuant to rule
74.04 of the Missouri rules of civil procedure, the court shall consider the burden-shifting
analysis of McDonnell Douglas Corp. v. Green, 411 U.S. 792 (1973), and its progeny to be
highly persuasive for analysis in cases not involving direct evidence of discrimination.
4. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates by this statute the cases of
Daugherty v. City of Maryland Heights, 231 S.W.3d 814 (Mo. 2007) and its progeny as they
relate to the contributing factor standard and abandonment of the burden-shifting framework
established in McDonnell Douglas Corp. v. Green, 411 U.S. 792 (1973).
5. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates by this statute the holding in
Hurst v. Kansas City Mo. School District, 437 S.W.3d 327 (Mo.App. W.D. 2014), that
Missouri Approved Instruction 19.01 may be applied to actions brought pursuant to this
chapter, and the holding in Thomas v. McKeever's Enterprises, Inc., 388 S.W.3d 206
(Mo.App. W.D. 2012), that juries shall not be instructed that plaintiffs bear the burden of
establishing "but for" causation in actions brought pursuant to this chapter.
6. The general assembly hereby abrogates all Missouri-approved jury instructions
specifically addressing civil actions brought under this chapter which were in effect prior to
August 28, 2017.]

HB 3425 19
213.111. 1. If, after one hundred eighty days from the filing of a complaint alleging
an unlawful discriminatory practice pursuant to section 213.055, 213.065 or 213.070 to the
extent that the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or involves a violation of section
213.055 or 213.065, or subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 213.070 as it relates to
employment and public accommodations, the commission has not completed its
administrative processing and the person aggrieved so requests in writing, the commission
shall issue to the person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or her right to bring a
civil action within ninety days of such notice against the respondent named in the complaint.
[If, after the filing of a complaint] Any person alleging an unlawful discriminatory
practice pursuant to sections 213.040, 213.045, 213.050 and 213.070, to the extent that the
alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or involves a violation of sections 213.040,
213.045 and 213.050, or subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 213.070 as it relates to
housing, [and the person aggrieved so requests in writing, the commission shall issue to the
person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or her right to bring a civil action
within ninety days of such notice against the respondent named in the complaint] may file a
petition in the circuit court of the county in which the alleged unlawful discriminatory
practice occurred without first filing a complaint with the commission. The commission
may not at any other time or for any other reason issue a letter indicating a complainant's right
to bring a civil action. Such an action may be brought in any circuit court in any county in
which the unlawful discriminatory practice is alleged to have been committed, either before a
circuit or associate circuit judge. Upon issuance of this notice, the commission shall
terminate all proceedings relating to the complaint. No person may file or reinstate a
complaint with the commission after the issuance of a notice under this section relating to the
same practice or act. Any action brought in court under this section shall be filed within
ninety days from the date of the commission's notification letter to the individual but no later
than two years after the alleged cause occurred or its reasonable discovery by the alleged
injured party.
2. The court may grant as relief, as it deems appropriate, any permanent or temporary
injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order, and may award to the plaintiff actual
and punitive damages, and may award court costs and reasonable [attorney] attorney'sfees to
the prevailing party, other than a state agency or commission or a local commission; except
that, a prevailing respondent may be awarded reasonable [attorney] attorney'sfees only upon
a showing that the case was without foundation.
3. Any party to any action initiated under this section has a right to a trial by jury.
4. The sum of the amount of actual damages, including damages for future pecuniary
losses, emotional pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, loss of enjoyment of life,
and other nonpecuniary losses, and punitive damages awarded under this section for an

HB 3425 20
unlawful discriminatory practice related to employment shall not exceed for each
complaining party:
(1) Actual back pay and interest on back pay; and
(2) (a) In the case of a respondent who has more than five and fewer than one
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, fifty thousand dollars;
(b) In the case of a respondent who has more than one hundred and fewer than two
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, one hundred thousand dollars;
(c) In the case of a respondent who has more than two hundred and fewer than five
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, two hundred thousand dollars; or
(d) In the case of a respondent who has more than five hundred employees in each of
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year, five hundred
thousand dollars.
[5. In any employment-related civil action brought under this chapter, the plaintiff
shall bear the burden of proving the alleged unlawful decision or action was made or taken
because of his or her protected classification and was the direct proximate cause of the
claimed damages.]
✔